Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 3. Records, Recordation and Indexing Generally.

§ 17.1-223.
Duty of clerk to record writings, etc., and make index.

Every writing authorized by law to be recorded, with all certificates, plats, schedules or other papers thereto annexed or thereon endorsed, upon payment of fees for the same and the tax thereon, if any, shall, when admitted to record, be recorded by or under the direction of the clerk on such media as are prescribed by §

17.1-239

. However, unless a cover sheet is submitted with the writing in accordance with §

17.1-227.1

, the clerk has the authority to reject any writing for recordation unless (i) as to any individual who is a party to such writing, the surname only of such individual is underscored or written entirely in capital letters in the first clause of the writing that identifies the names of the parties; (ii) each page of the writing is numbered consecutively; (iii) in the case of a writing described in §

58.1-801

or

58.1-807

, the amount of the consideration and the actual value of the property conveyed is stated on the first page of the writing; (iv) the laws of the United States or the Commonwealth under which any exemption from recordation taxes is claimed is clearly stated on the face of the writing; and (v) the name of each party to such writing under whose name the writing is to be indexed as grantor, grantee, or both is listed in the first clause of the writing that identifies the names of the parties and identified therein as grantor, grantee, or both, as applicable. Such writing, once recorded, may be returned to any party to such writing who is identified therein as a grantee unless otherwise indicated clearly on the face of the writing, or any cover sheet, including an appropriate current address to which such writing shall be returned.

The attorney or party who prepares the writing for recordation shall ensure that the writing satisfies the requirements of subsection A and that (i) the social security number is removed from the writing prior to the instrument being submitted for recordation, (ii) a deed conveying residential property containing not more than four residential dwelling units states on the first page of the document the name of the title insurance underwriter insuring such instrument or a statement that the existence of title insurance is unknown to the preparer, and (iii) a deed conveying residential property containing not more than four residential dwelling units states on the first page of the document that it was prepared by the owner of the real property or by an attorney licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth where such statement by an attorney shall include the name and Virginia State Bar number of the attorney who prepared the deed, provided, however, that clause (iii) shall not apply to deeds of trust or to deeds in which a public service company, railroad, or cable system operator is either a grantor or grantee, and it shall be sufficient for the purposes of clause (iii) that deeds prepared under the supervision of the Office of the Attorney General of Virginia so state without the name of an attorney or bar number.

If the clerk has an eRecording System as defined in §

55.1-661

, the clerk shall follow the provisions of this section, and the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act (§

55.1-661

et seq.), for recordation of documents. If the clerk does not have an eRecording System, the clerk shall record a legible paper copy of an electronic document, provided that such copy (i) otherwise meets the requirements of this section for recordation and (ii) is certified to be a true and correct copy of the electronic original by the attorney, settlement agent, or other party who submits the document for recordation. If a clerk’s eRecording System is not operational at any time, or the eRecording System does not accept the type of electronic document being submitted, such clerk shall use the process for recording a legible paper copy of an electronic copy as set out herein. An affidavit under this section may be made in the following form, or to the same effect:Affidavit of SubmitterThe undersigned affiant, being first duly sworn, deposes and states as follows, prepared pursuant to §

17.1-223

of the Code of Virginia, that the attached electronic document is a true and correct copy of the electronic original.(Name of submitter) _______________ (Signature of submitter) _______________ (Address of submitter) _______________ (Telephone of submitter) _______________ (Email of submitter) _______________ The foregoing affidavit was acknowledged before me this _______________ day of _______________ , 20 _______________ , byNotary public: _______________ My commission expires: _______________ .Notary Registration Number: _______________ .

A writing that appears on its face to have been properly notarized in accordance with the Virginia Notary Act (§

47.1-1

et seq.) shall be presumed to have been notarized properly and shall be recorded by the clerk, if such document otherwise meets the requirements of this section for recordation.

If the writing is accepted for recordation in the deed books, it shall be deemed to be validly recorded for all purposes. Such books shall be indexed by the clerk as provided by §

17.1-249

and carefully preserved. Upon admitting any such writing or other paper to record, the clerk shall endorse thereon the day and time of day of such recordation. More than one book may be used contemporaneously under the direction of the clerk for the recordation of the writings mentioned in this section whenever it may be necessary to use more than one book for the proper conduct of the business of the clerk’s office.

History.

Code 1919, § 3392, § 17-59; 1926, p. 465; 1934, p. 514; 1979, c. 527; 1983, c. 293; 1985, c. 246; 1986, c. 167; 1990, c. 374; 1996, c. 454; 1998, c. 872; 2004, c. 336; 2007, c. 451; 2008, cc. 117, 814, 823, 833; 2012, c. 74; 2013, c. 193; 2014, c. 338; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 78.

Cross references.

As to recordation of inventories and accounts of sales, see §

64.2-1310

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 117 and 814, cl. 2 provides: “That any document notarized prior to July 1, 2008, shall not be affected or invalidated by amendments to this Act effective July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2014, c. 338, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, except that the provisions of this act amending §§

17.1-223

and

17.1-227.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on January 1, 2015.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 336 substituted “No” for “In addition, no” at the beginning of the third sentence, added the fourth sentence, and substituted “If” for “However, if” at the beginning of the fifth sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 451 inserted subsection designations; in subsection A, substituted “has the authority to reject” for “may refuse to accept” in the second sentence and added the third sentence; rewrote the former third and fourth sentences, now subsection B, which had read: “No deed shall be accepted for record by the clerk unless it is accompanied by a current business or residence address of the grantee or a designee. The person or entity submitting a deed or deed of trust conveying not more than four residential dwelling units may state on the first page of the document the name of the title insurance underwriter insuring such instrument and the title insurance policy number or a statement that there is no title insurance in effect with respect to the document or a statement that such identifying number is not available or is unknown.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 117 and 814 are identical, and added subsection C, and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and inserted “and if a cover sheet is used pursuant to §

17.1-227.1

, that the names of all grantors and grantees on the face of such writing are the same on the cover sheet” in clause (iv) of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 74 inserted the third and fourth sentences in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 193, in subsection A, combined the former third and next-to-last sentences into the present next-to-last sentence by substituting “that does not comply with this section” for “except for deeds in which a public service company, railroad, or cable system operator is either a grantor or grantee, unless the deed states on the first page of the document that it was prepared by the owner of the real property or by an attorney licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth where such statement by an attorney shall include the name and Virginia State Bar number of the attorney who prepared the deed. However, it shall be sufficient that deeds prepared under the supervision of the Office of the Attorney General of Virginia so state without the name of an attorney or bar number”; and in subsection B, added clause (iii) and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 338, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote subsection A; in subsection B inserted “residential property containing” in clauses (ii) and (iii); in subsection C substituted “writing that” for “document which”; in subsection D substituted “If the writing is accepted for recordation in the deed books” for “If the writing or deed is accepted for record and spread on the deed books” in the first sentence and deleted the last sentence, which read “After being so recorded such writings may be delivered to the party entitled to claim under the same”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 78, effective March 11, 2021, inserted subsection C; redesignated former subsections C and D as subsections D and E; and in subsection D, substituted “shall” for “may” and added “if such document otherwise meets the requirements of this section for recordation” at the end.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia property law for the year 1989-1990, see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 725 (1990).

For annual survey article, see “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 23 Assets of Estate. § 23.20 Virginia Uniform Real Property Transfer on Death Act. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-500. Virginia Land Records Cover Sheet for Recordation of Deed, et seq.

§ 17.1-224.
Copy of illegible instrument used for making permanent record.

In offices of clerks of courts of record in which instruments are recorded by any photographic or electronic imaging process, the clerk may, in the event any such instrument is in such condition that a perfect and legible record cannot be produced by such process, make and certify a copy of such instrument, for which he shall be entitled to such fees as are prescribed by law for making and certifying copies of instruments, and use such copy for making permanent records of his office by such photographic or electronic imaging process. Such original instrument shall be preserved in the clerk’s office, in the same manner as is prescribed by law for preserving wills.

History.

1948, p. 776; Michie Suppl. 1948, § 3387b, § 17-59.1; 1998, c. 872; 2010, cc. 717, 760.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 717 and 760 are identical, and twice inserted “or electronic imaging” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

§ 17.1-225.
Remote access to nonconfidential court records.

The clerk of the circuit court of any county or city may provide remote access, including Internet access, to all nonconfidential court records on an automated case management or other system maintained by his office and described in §

17.1-242

. The clerk shall be responsible for insuring that proper security measures are implemented and maintained to prevent remote access users from obtaining any data that are confidential under this Code and to prevent the modification or destruction of any records by remote access users. For purposes of this section, remote access users are those individuals who are not employees of the clerk’s office. Secure remote access to land records shall be governed by §

17.1-294

.

History.

1985, c. 489, § 17-59.2; 1993, c. 445; 1997, c. 413; 1998, c. 872; 2001, c. 497; 2008, cc. 823, 833; 2014, c. 460; z.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 497 inserted “and described in §

17.1-242

” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “that are” for “which is” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 460 inserted “on an automated case management or other system” in the first sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Internet access provided by circuit court clerk. —

A circuit court clerk may provide Internet access to case management data maintined by the clerk’s office, but may not provide Internet access to data provided by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia through a direct dial-up service known as the Law Office and Public Access System. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable J. Jack Kennedy Jr., Clerk, Circuit Court for Wise County and the City of Norton, 00-031, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 43 (7/27/00).

A circuit court clerk has the discretion to grant access to an automated case management system. —

A circuit court clerk, as custodian of the records maintained in an automated case management system, has the discretion to grant access to such a system. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judy L. Worthington, Clerk of the Circuit Court of Chesterfield County, 02-026, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 62 (4/4/02).

§ 17.1-226.
Remote access to certain agencies from clerk of court.

The governing body of any locality may give the clerk of its circuit court information from local agencies that the clerk may provide to remote access users.

History.

1985, c. 489, § 17-59.3; 1998, c. 872; 2008, cc. 823, 833.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and rewrote this section.

§ 17.1-227.
Documents to be recorded in deed books; social security numbers.

All deeds, deeds of trust, deeds of release, certificates of satisfaction or certificates of partial satisfaction, quitclaim deeds, homestead deeds, grants, transfers and mortgages of real estate, releases of such mortgages, powers of attorney to convey real estate, leases of real estate, notices of lis pendens and all contracts in reference to real estate, which have been acknowledged as required by law, and certified copies of final judgments or decrees of partition affecting the title or possession of real estate, any part of which is situated in the county or city in which it is sought to be recorded, and all other writings relating to or affecting real estate which are authorized to be recorded, shall, unless otherwise provided, be recorded in a book to be known as the deed book. All deeds, deeds of trust, deeds of release, quitclaim deeds, grants, transfers, and mortgages of real estate or any addendum or memorandum relating to any of these instruments submitted for recordation in the deed books of the appropriate office of the clerk of court shall be prepared according to the requirements for deeds and deeds of trust as set forth in §§

55.1-300

and

55.1-316

, as applicable. The clerk may refuse to accept any instrument submitted for recordation that includes a social security number. However, the attorney or party who prepares or submits the instrument has responsibility for ensuring that the social security number is removed from the instrument prior to the instrument being submitted for recordation. The clerk shall be immune from suits arising from the recordation of any document, or the content of any document recorded, in the land records pursuant to this or any other applicable provision of this Code unless the clerk was grossly negligent or engaged in willful misconduct. Each instrument shall be indexed under all such names in accordance with the provisions of §

17.1-249

.

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-60; 1920, p. 313; 1932, p. 333; 1975, c. 469; 1976, c. 561; 1977, c. 282; 1990, c. 374; 1994, c. 64; 1997, c. 579; 1998, c. 872; 2003, cc. 862, 914, 918; 2004, c. 352; 2014, c. 338.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 918, cl. 2 provides: “The Office of the Attorney General shall, on or before January 1, 2004, establish procedures for the management of identity theft information.”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-300 and

55.1-316

” for “55-48 and 55-58.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 862, 914 and 918 are identical, and inserted the next-to-last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 352 inserted the present fourth sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 338 substituted “deeds and deeds of trust as set forth in §§ 55-48 and 55-58, as applicable” for “deeds as set forth in §§ 55-48 and 55-58 and shall include the names of all grantors and grantees in the first clause of each such instrument” in the second sentence; deleted “grantor’s, grantee’s or trustee’s” preceding “social security number” in the third sentence; and inserted the fifth sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on property for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1834 (1975).

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

For survey article on the law pertaining to wills, trusts, and estates, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of real estate and land use law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2004).

For 2003/2004 survey of the law of wills, trusts and estates, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 447 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, §§ 2, 6.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Recordation taxes on documents intended to allow individuals of the Islamic faith to acquire real estate without violating a tenet of their religion. —

A circuit court clerk should base the recordation taxes for a “Security Instrument,” which allows for the payment of profits as opposed to a traditional deed of trust that is secured by a note requiring the payment of interest, on the original acquisition balance as defined in the instrument, and should assess separate fees for recording an “Assignment Agreement,” since the document contains two instruments of equal dignity that serve independent purposes at law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Clerk of the Fairfax County Circuit Court, 02-041, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 67 (6/24/02).

§ 17.1-227.1.
Use of cover sheets on deeds or other instruments by circuit court clerks.

Circuit court clerks may require that any deed or other instrument conveying or relating to an interest in real property be submitted for recordation with a cover sheet detailing the information contained in the deed or other instrument necessary for the clerk to properly index such instrument. The cover sheet shall be developed in conjunction with the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall include the following information: (i) the name of each party to be indexed as grantor and the name of each party to be indexed as grantee and, in the case of any individual grantor or grantee, the surname of each individual identified as such; (ii) in the case of a deed or other instrument described in §

58.1-801

or

58.1-807

, the amount of the consideration and the actual value of the property conveyed; (iii) the Virginia or federal law under which any exemption from recordation taxes is claimed; (iv) if required under §

17.1-252

, the tax map reference number or numbers, or the parcel identification number (PIN) or numbers, of the affected parcel or parcels; and (v) the name and current address of the person to whom the instrument should be returned after recordation.

In any clerk’s office that does not require a cover sheet, the attorney or other party presenting a deed or other instrument conveying or relating to an interest in real property may submit a cover sheet with such deed or other instrument containing all of the information required under subsection A, and in such case the deed or other instrument need not contain the information otherwise required to be included under subsection A of §

17.1-223

, except that each page thereof shall be numbered consecutively as provided in subsection A of §

17.1-223

.

The attorney or other party who prepares the cover sheet submitted with any deed or other instrument conveying or relating to an interest in real property for recordation has the responsibility for ensuring the accuracy of the information contained in the cover sheet, and the clerk may rely on the information provided therein.The cover sheet may be recorded with the deed or other instrument with which it is submitted, but it shall not be included as a page for determining the amount of any applicable filing fees pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

17.1-275

except in the case of a cover sheet submitted pursuant to subsection B. The cover sheet shall be provided only for information purposes to facilitate the recordation of the deed or other instrument with which it is submitted. The cover sheet shall not be construed to convey title to any interest in real property, purport to be a document in the chain of title conveying any interest in real property, or be considered a part of, or affect the interpretation of, the deed or other instrument with which it is submitted, regardless of whether the clerk records the cover sheet with such instrument.

History.

1999, cc. 363, 369; 2000, cc. 440, 446; 2008, cc. 823, 833; 2014, c. 338.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 338, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, except that the provisions of this act amending §§

17.1-223

and

17.1-227.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on January 1, 2015.”

Acts 2014, c. 338, cl. 3 provides: “That by January 1, 2015, (i) the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall develop a nonelectronic, hard copy form of cover sheet, consistent with §

17.1-227.1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, for use by attorneys or other parties who choose to submit a cover sheet to those circuit court clerks who do not require cover sheets and (ii) those circuit court clerks who require cover sheets using a software program not provided by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall revise such program to ensure that their cover sheets will include the information required by §

17.1-227.1

.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 440 and 446 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “Circuit court clerks may” for “The clerk of the circuit court in any (i) county with a population between 7,000 and 7,500, (ii) county with a population between 39,500 and 42,000, (iii) county with a population between 10,250 and 10,400, and (iv) city with a population between 4,000 and 4,500 may request, but shall not” at the beginning of the first sentence, and in the last sentence, substituted “developed in conjunction with” for “in a form approved by” and deleted “and used in connection with the Financial Management System and Record Indexing System provided to such circuit court clerks by the Supreme Court of Virginia” at the end of the sentence; and deleted the former third paragraph, which read: “The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2002.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and added the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 338, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Equitable estoppel did not bar deed of trust. —

Bank’s deed of trust was not barred by the doctrine of equitable estoppel because an erroneous cover sheet did not rise to the level of a misrepresentation of a material fact; a mortgagor did not rely upon the cover sheet but upon the index of the clerk of court. Mega Int'l Commerce Bank v. MCAP Capital, L.L.C., 74 Va. Cir. 132, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 289 (Norfolk Sept. 6, 2007).

Duty to record deed of trust. —

Clerk of court had a duty under §

17.1-249

to record a bank’s deed of trust correctly because the clerk was required to index consistently with the instrument itself, not the cover sheet, which contained erroneous information; nothing in §

17.1-227.1

repeals or otherwise modifies the clerk’s duty to properly index the recorded instrument, and the statute does exonerate the clerk for his failure to do so, notwithstanding an erroneous cover sheet. Mega Int'l Commerce Bank v. MCAP Capital, L.L.C., 74 Va. Cir. 132, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 289 (Norfolk Sept. 6, 2007).

§ 17.1-228.
Recording releases of deeds of trust, partial releases of deeds of trust, court ordered releases, or other liens or assignments in cities and counties using microfilm.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever the writings required by law to be recorded in the deed book in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of any city or county are recorded by a microphotographic process or by any other method or process which renders impractical or impossible the subsequent entering of marginal notations upon a recorded instrument, an appropriate certificate, certificate of satisfaction, certificate of partial satisfaction, certified copy of order, or other separate instrument setting forth the necessary information shall be recorded and indexed according to law.

When existing deed books in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of any county or city are to be microfilmed or digitally reproduced for security purposes, the clerk may provide that marginal notations to accomplish the release of deeds of trust or other liens shall not be made in such deed book so microfilmed or digitally reproduced.

History.

1975, c. 469, § 17-60.1; 1978, c. 629; 1991, c. 414; 1998, c. 872; 2008, cc. 823, 833.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and inserted “or digitally reproduced” twice in the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on property for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1834 (1975).

§ 17.1-229.
Additional documents to be recorded in deed book.

All deeds, homestead deeds and leases of personal property, bills of sale, and all other contracts or liens as to personal property, which are by law required or permitted to be recorded, all mechanics’ liens, all other liens not directed to be recorded elsewhere and all other writings relating to or affecting personal property which are authorized to be recorded shall, unless otherwise provided, be recorded in the deed book and shall be indexed in the general index book; provided, however, the clerk may reject any writing for recordation that is not specifically authorized by law and set out in the Code of Virginia.

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-61; 1920, p. 313; 1932, p. 333; 1985, c. 392; 1998, c. 872; 2010, c. 352.

Cross references.

For requirement that, on and after July 1, 1964, documents previously required to be recorded in the miscellaneous lien book be recorded in the deed book and indexed in the general index of deeds, see §

43-4.1

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 352 inserted “provided, however, the clerk may reject any writing for recordation that is not specifically authorized by law and set out in the Code of Virginia” at the end.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, § 93.

§ 17.1-230.
Documents to be recorded in bond book.

All bonds taken of officers, executors, administrators, trustees or other fiduciaries and all bonds of commissioners and receivers, and all suspending bonds, appeal bonds, injunction bonds, attachment bonds, cost bonds, and all other bonds required to be recorded, shall be recorded in a book known as the bond book.

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-62; 1920, p. 313; 1932, p. 333; 1981, c. 295; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Receivers, § 22.

§ 17.1-231.
Documents to be recorded in will book.

All wills, inventories, appraisements, lists of sales and settlements of accounts of executors, administrators, curators, trustees or other fiduciaries shall be recorded in a book to be known as the will book. Provided, that the judges of the several courts of the Commonwealth before whom fiduciaries qualify may, by order, prescribe that inventories, appraisements, accounts of sale and settlement of accounts of fiduciaries, together with all reports and decrees or orders, or portions thereof, proper to be recorded therewith, shall be recorded either in the current will book or in a book to be kept by the clerk for that purpose. Such courts may prescribe that the settlements of accounts of fiduciaries be recorded in the mode prescribed by §

64.2-1214

.

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-63; 1920, p. 313; 1932, p. 333; 1998, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “26-35” was changed to “64.2-1214” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

§ 17.1-232.
What to be recorded in judgment docket.

Abstracts of all judgments authorized or required by law to be docketed or recorded shall be recorded in a book to be known as the judgment docket.

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-64; 1920, p. 314; 1932, p. 334; 1998, c. 872; 2002, c. 832.

Cross references.

As to manner of docketing judgments, see §

8.01-449

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 832 deleted “and abstracts of all executions issued on any judgment” preceding “shall be recorded.”

§ 17.1-233.
What to be recorded in marriage register.

All marriage licenses and all matters relating to marriages required or authorized to be recorded under §

20-20

shall be recorded in a book to be known as the marriage register.

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-65; 1920, p. 314; 1932, p. 334; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 6.

§ 17.1-234.
Documents to be recorded in “writings partially proved.”

All deeds and other instruments which have been only partially proved shall be recorded in a separate book to be known as “writings partially proved.”

History.

Code 1919, § 3393, § 17-66; 1920, p. 314; 1932, p. 334; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-235.
Recordation of federal farm loan mortgages.

The clerks of the circuit courts shall keep a separate book, which shall be known as the federal farm loan mortgage book, in which shall be recorded mortgages executed to secure the payment of loans made by federal land banks under authority of the act of Congress, approved July 17, 1916, known as the Federal Farm Loan Act, which mortgages, when so recorded in such book shall be indexed in the proper general index book, as well as in the index to such farm loan mortgage book; provided that any such clerk instead of providing such separate book may immediately spread upon the book in which deeds are recorded in his office any and all proper mortgages or deeds of trust executed to secure such loans and all of such mortgages and deeds of trust shall be immediately spread upon such records when received, so that the original thereof may be returned to the federal land bank as soon as possible.

History.

1918, p. 437, § 17-67; Michie Code 1942, § 3393b; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 17.1-236.
Recordation of plats and maps.

All plats and maps may in the discretion of the clerks of the several circuit courts be recorded in a book to be known as the plat book. In case of such recordation of any plat or map which is attached to or made a part of any deed, deed of trust or writing which is recorded in the deed book, an appropriate note shall be made on the deed book where such deed, deed of trust or other writing is recorded, referring to the plat book and page where the plat or map is recorded and the clerk shall endorse on the plat and plat book the date of the recordation and a reference by book and page to the recorded instrument of which it is a part and shall sign the certificate. In those courts where deeds and other writings are recorded by a procedural microfilm recording system, all plats shall be recorded with the deeds and other writings and indexed in the general index to deeds. Wherever plats are maintained singly, as in a cabinet or on microfilm aperture cards, they shall be cross-referenced with the deed books in the same manner as prescribed herein when plats are recorded in a separate plat book. All plats submitted for recordation shall meet the standards for plats as adopted under §

42.1-82

of the Virginia Public Records Act (§

42.1-76

et seq.).

History.

1918, p. 504, § 17-68; Michie Code 1942, § 3393a; 1944, p. 472; 1983, c. 180; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-237.
Validation of recordations in certain plat books.

All books in which prior to June 24, 1944, plats were recorded separately from the deed books in all the clerks’ offices of this Commonwealth are hereby validated and made parts of the official records of the offices.

History.

1918, p. 504, § 17-69; Michie Code 1942, § 3393a; 1944, p. 472; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-238.
State highway plat book.

The state highway plat book, which shall be provided by the Department of Transportation, shall be installed in the circuit court clerk’s office of each county of the Commonwealth and in the clerk’s office of the circuit court of any city wherein the Department of Transportation has acquired any interest in land, and all highway plats pertaining to the primary and secondary highway systems, and all plats in connection therewith, shall be filed therein by the clerk. The state highway plat book may be produced in one of the following forms: (i) paper; (ii) microfilm, microfiche, or any other microphotographic process, that meets state archival microfilm standards and state electronic records guidelines pursuant to §

42.1-82

; or (iii) electronic process. The clerk shall note on each recorded deed relating to such plats and in the deed book, wherein such deed is recorded, or through recordation of a separate instrument referencing the page where such deed is recorded, the numbers of the state highway plat book and page wherein such plats are filed. The clerk so filing the plats and so noting the same shall receive a fee of $5. All plats filed prior to July 1, 1950, in such state highway plat book are hereby validated.

History.

1950, p. 477, § 17-69.1; 1956, c. 19; 1994, c. 432; 1998, c. 872; 2014, c. 330; 2015, c. 641.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 330 substituted “in” for “on the margin of the page of.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 641 substituted “The” for “A loose-leaf book known as” in the first sentence, added the second sentence; inserted “or through recordation of a separate instrument referencing the page where such deed is recorded” in the third sentence, deleted “be and the same” following “state highway plat book” in the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 17.1-239.
Character of books used for recording; standards for microfilm, etc.

All books used in the clerk’s office for the permanent recordation of deeds, wills and other instruments shall either be made of high quality record paper, strictly number one rag stock, or permanent-durable, acid-free paper composed of strong, well-purified chemical wood fibers as prescribed by regulations pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

42.1-82

, or, if microfilm, microfiche, or microphotographic process is used in the clerk’s office, the deeds, wills or other instruments shall be processed in accordance with standards established pursuant to §

42.1-82

. All books are to be substantially bound, with a durable cloth or plastic cover over all.

History.

Code 1919, § 3399, § 17-70; 1934, p. 174; 1972, c. 501; 1975, c. 58; 1983, c. 293; 1988, c. 35; 1998, c. 872.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

§ 17.1-240.
Recording by microphotographic or electronic process.

A procedural microphotographic process, digital reproduction, or any other micrographic process that stores images of documents in reduced size or in electronic format may be used to accomplish the recording of writings otherwise required by any provision of law to be spread in a book or retained in the circuit court clerk’s office, including the civil and criminal order books, the Will Book or Fiduciary Account Book, the Juvenile Order Book, the Adoption Order Book, the Trust Fund Order Book, the Deed Book, the Plat Book, the Land Book, the Bond Book, the Judgment Docket Book, the Partnership or Assumed Name Certificate Book, marriage records, and financing statements. Any such micrographic, microphotographic, or electronic recording process shall meet archival standards as recommended by The Library of Virginia.

History.

1977, c. 142, § 17-70.1; 1983, c. 293; 1997, c. 579; 1998, c. 872; 2005, c. 681; 2018, c. 523.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, in the first sentence, substituted “civil and criminal order books” for “Common Law Order Book, the Chancery Order Book, the Clerk’s Order Books” and “Will Book or” for “Will Book and/or.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 523 substituted “that” for “which,” deleted “but not limited to” following “including” and inserted “the Bond Book” in the first sentence.

§ 17.1-241.
Clerks to procure books for record.

Every circuit court clerk shall procure appropriate books for records as the business of his office requires. But orders for the same shall first be obtained by the clerks from the governing bodies of their respective counties or cities.

History.

Code 1919, § 3400, § 17-71; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-242.
Custody of books, records, etc.

The circuit court clerks shall have custody of and shall keep all court records, including books, evidence, records, maps, and papers, deposited in their offices or at such location otherwise designated by the clerk, as well as records stored in electronic format whether the storage media for such electronic records are on premises or elsewhere.

History.

Code 1919, § 3400, § 17-72; 1998, c. 872; 2001, c. 497; 2014, c. 460.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 497 added “as well as records stored in electronic format whether the storage media for such electronic records are on premises or elsewhere.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 460 inserted “court records, including,” “evidence,” and “or at such location otherwise designated by the clerk,” and made minor stylistic changes.